Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.050

Bonds—Issuer authorized to establish lines of credit.

Each local government authorized to issue bonds is authorized to establish lines of credit with any qualified public depository to be drawn upon in exchange for its bonds or other obligations, to delegate to its treasurer authority to determine the amount of credit extended, and to pay interest and other finance or service charges. The interest rates on such bonds or other obligations may be a fixed rate or rates set periodically or a variable rate or rates determined by agreement of the parties.

[ 2003 c 23 s 1; 1983 c 167 s 5.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.